pl: Typ zwierzęcia: Bobry; Ptaki; Dziki; Rysie; Koty; Bydło; Kameleony; Kurczaki; Szynszyle; Wiewiórki; Kojoty; Jeleń; Psy; Kaczki; Fretki; Lisy; Żaby; Gekony; Gęsi; Myszoskoczki; Kozy; Susły; Świstaki; Świnki morskie; Chomiki; Kraby pustelniki; Jaszczurki; Myszy; Stada mieszane; Krety; Świnie; Oposy; Króliki; Szopy; Szczury; Gady; Gryzonie; Owce; Skunksy; Węże; Wiewiórki; Indyki; Żółwie; Pozostałe
ja: 動物の種類: ビーバー; 鳥; イノシシ; ボブキャット; ネコ; ウシ; カメレオン; ニワトリ; チンチラ; シマリス; コヨーテ; シカ; イヌ; アヒル; フェレット; キツネ; カエル; ヤモリ; ガチョウ; スナネズミ; ヤギ; ホリネズミ; グラウンドホッグ; モルモット; ハムスター; ヤドカリ; トカゲ; マウス; 混群; モグラ; ブタ; ポッサム; ウサギ; アライグマ; ネズミ; 爬虫類; げっ歯類; ヒツジ; スカンク; ヘビ; リス; 七面鳥; カメ; その他
ko: 동물 종류: 비버; 새; 멧돼지; 보브캣; 고양이; 소; 카멜레온; 닭; 친칠라; 다람쥐; 코요테; 사슴; 개; 오리; 페럿; 여우; 개구리; 도마뱀붙이; 거위; 저빌; 염소; 고퍼; 마멋; 기니피그; 햄스터; 소라게; 도마뱀; 쥐; 혼합 무리; 두더지; 돼지; 포섬; 토끼; 라쿤; 시궁쥐; 파충류; 설치류; 양; 스컹크; 뱀; 청설모; 칠면조; 거북; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de animal: Castores; Pássaros; Javalis; Linces; Gatos; Gado; Camaleões; Galinhas; Chincilas; Esquilos norte-americanos; Coiotes; Veado; Cães; Patos; Furões; Raposas; Sapos; Osgas; Gansos; Gerbos; Cabras; Mamíferos roedores pequenos; Marmotas; Porquinhos-da-índia; Hamsters; Caranguejos eremita; Lagartos; Ratos; Manadas mistas; Toupeiras; Porcos; Gambás; Coelhos; Guaxinins; Ratazanas; Répteis; Roedores; Ovelha; Doninhas fedorentas; Cobras; Esquilos; Perus; Tartarugas; Outro
es: Tipo de animal: Castores; Aves; Jabalíes; Linces; Gatos; Ganado; Camaleones; Gallinas; Chinchillas; Ardillas rayadas; Coyotes; Ciervos; Perros; Patos; Hurones; Zorros; Ranas; Gecos; Gansos; Jerbos; Cabras; Tuzas; Marmotas; Conejillos de indias; Hámsteres; Cangrejos ermitaños; Lagartijas; Ratones; Manada mixta; Topos; Cerdos; Zarigüeyas; Conejos; Mapaches; Ratas; Reptiles; Roedores; Oveja; Zorrillos; Serpientes; Ardillas; Pavos; Tortugas; Otros
sk-SK: Druh zvieraťa: Bobry; Vtáky; Diviaky; Rysy; Mačky; Dobytok; Chameleóny; Sliepky; Činčily; Veveričky; Kojoti; Jeleň; Psy; Kačice; Fretky; Líšky; Žaby; Gekóny; Husi; Pieskomily; Kozy; Gofery; Svište; Morčatá; Škrečky; Pustovnícke kraby; Jašterice; Myši; Zmiešané stádo; Krtkovia; Ošípané; Vačice; Králiky; Medvedíky čistotné; Potkany; Plazy; Hlodavce; Ovce; Skunky; Hady; Veveričky; Morky; Korytnačky; Iné
da: Dyretype: Bævere; Fugle; Vildsvin; Losser; Katte; Kvæg; Kamæleoner; Høns; Chinchillaer; Jordegern; Prærieulve; Hjorte; Hunde; Ænder; Ildere; Ræve; Frøer; Gekkoer; Gæs; Ørkenrotter; Geder; Taskegofere; Jordsvin; Marsvin; Hamstere; Eremitkrebs; Firben; Mus; Blandet flok; Muldvarpe; Svin; Pungrotter; Kaniner; Vaskebjørne; Rotter; Krybdyr; Gnavere; Får; Stinkdyr; Slanger; Egern; Kalkuner; Skildpadder; Andet
sv: Typ av djur: Bävrar; Fåglar; Galtar; Rödlo; Katter; Nötkreatur; Kameleonter; Kycklingar; Chinchillor; Jordekorrar; Prärievargar; Rådjur; Hundar; Ankor; Illrar; Rävar; Grodor; Geckoödlor; Gäss; Gerbiler; Getter; Kindpåsråttor; Skogsmurmeldjur; Marsvin; Hamstrar; Eremitkräftor; Ödlor; Möss; Blandad besättning; Mullvadar; Grisar; Possums; Kaniner; Tvättbjörnar; Råttor; Reptiler; Gnagare; Får; Skunkar; Ormar; Ekorrar; Kalkoner; Sköldpaddor; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta životinje: Dabrovi; Ptice; Veprovi; Crveni risovi; Mačke; Stoka; Kameleoni; Kokoši; Činčile; Kanadske vjeverice; Kojoti; Jelen; Psi; Patke; Feretke; Lisice; Žabe; Gekoni; Guske; Gerbili; Koze; Mišoliki glodavci; Svisci; Zamorci; Hrčci; Rakovi samci; Gušteri; Miševi; Mješovito stado; Krtice; Svinje; Oposumi; Zečevi; Rakuni; Štakori; Gmazovi; Glodavci; Ovce; Tvorovi; Zmije; Vjeverice; Purani; Kornjače; Ostalo
nb: Dyretype: Bevere; Fugler; Villsvin; Rødgaupe; Katter; Kveg; Kameleoner; Kyllinger; Chinchillaer; Jordekorn; Prærierev; Hjort; Hunder; Ender; Ildere; Rever; Frosker; Gekkoer; Gjess; Gerbiler; Geiter; Gophers; Skogmurmeldyr; Marsvin; Hamstere; Eremittkreps; Øgler; Mus; Blandet flokk; Muldvarper; Griser; Pungrotter; Kaniner; Vaskebjørn; Rotter; Reptiler; Gnagere; Sau; Skunker; Slanger; Ekorn; Kalkuner; Skilpadder; Annen
ru: Вид животного: Бобры; Птицы; Кабаны; Рыси; Кошки; Скот; Хамелеоны; Куры; Шиншиллы; Бурундуки; Койоты; Олени; Собаки; Утки; Хорьки; Лисы; Лягушки; Гекконы; Гуси; Песчанки; Козы; Суслики; Сурки; Морские свинки; Хомяки; Раки-отшельники; Ящерицы; Мыши; Смешанное стадо; Кроты; Свиньи; Поссумы; Кролики; Еноты; Крысы; Рептилии; Грызуны; Овцы; Скунсы; Змеи; Белки; Индейки; Черепахи; Другое
lt-LT: Gyvūno rūšis: Bebrai; Paukščiai; Šernai; Rudosios lūšys; Katės; Galvijai; Chameleonai; Vištos; Šinšilos; Burundukai; Kojotai; Elniai; Šunys; Antys; Šeškai; Lapės; Varlės; Gekonai; Žąsys; Mongolinės smiltpelės; Ožkos; Goferai; Švilpikai; Jūrų kiaulytės; Žiurkėnai; Krabai atsiskyrėliai; Driežai; Pelės; Mišri banda; Kurmiai; Kiaulės; Oposumai; Triušiai; Meškėnai; Žiurkės; Ropliai; Graužikai; Avys; Skunkai; Gyvatės; Voverės; Kalakutai; Vėžliai; Kita
tr: Hayvan Türü: Kunduzlar; Kuşlar; Yaban domuzları; Vaşaklar; Kediler; Sığırlar; Bukalemunlar; Tavuklar; Şinşillalar; Çizgili sincaplar; Çakallar; Geyikler; Köpekler; Ördekler; Gelincikler; Tilkiler; Kurbağalar; Gekolar; Kazlar; Çöl fareleri; Keçiler; Tarla sincapları; Kunduzlar; Gine domuzları; Hamsterler; Keşiş yengeçleri; Kertenkeleler; Fareler; Karışık sürü; Köstebekler; Domuzlar; Keseli sıçanlar; Tavşanlar; Rakunlar; Sıçanlar; Sürüngenler; Kemirgenler; Koyun; Kokarcalar; Yılanlar; Sincaplar; Hindiler; Kaplumbağalar; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip animal: Castori; Păsări; Mistreți; Lincși; Pisici; Bovine; Cameleoni; Găini; Șinșila; Veverițe dungate; Coioți; Căprioare; Câini; Rațe; Dihori; Vulpi; Broaște; Șopârlă gecko; Gâște; Gerbili; Capre; Popândăi; Marmote; Porcușori de Guineea; Hamsters; Crabi pustnici; Șopârle; Șoareci; Turme mixte; Cârtițe; Porci; Oposumi; Iepuri; Ratoni; Șobolani; Reptile; Rozătoare; Oi; Sconcși; Șerpi; Veverițe; Curcani; Țestoase; Altele
bg-BG: Животински вид: Бобри; Птици; Глигани; Рисове; Котки; Говеда; Хамелеони; Пилета; Чинчили; Бурундуци; Койоти; Елен; Кучета; Патици; Порове; Лисици; Жаби; Гекони; Гъски; Песчанки; Кози; Гофери; Сурци; Морски свинчета; Хамстери; Раци отшелник; Гущери; Мишки; Смесено стадо; Къртици; Прасета; Опосуми; Зайци; Еноти; Плъхове; Влечуги; Гризачи; Овце; Скунксове; Змии; Катерици; Пуйки; Костенурки; Други
zh-CN: 动物类型: 海狸; 鸟类; 野猪; 山猫; 猫; 牛; 变色龙; 鸡; 龙猫; 花栗鼠; 土狼; 鹿; 狗; 鸭子; 雪貂; 狐狸; 青蛙; 壁虎; 鹅; 沙鼠; 山羊; 地鼠; 土拨鼠; 豚鼠; 仓鼠; 寄居蟹; 蜥蜴; 鼠类; 混合牧群; 鼹鼠; 猪; 负鼠; 兔子; 浣熊; 老鼠; 爬行动物; 啮齿动物; 羊; 臭鼬; 蛇; 松鼠; 火鸡; 海龟; 其他
fi: Eläintyyppi: Majavat; Linnut; Villisiat; Punailvekset; Kissat; Nautakarja; Kameleontit; Kanat; Chinchillat; Pikkuoravat; Kojootit; Peurat; Koirat; Ankat; Fretit; Ketut; Sammakot; Gekot; Hanhet; Gerbiilit; Vuohet; Taskurotat; Metsämurmelit; Marsut; Hamsterit; Erakkoravut; Liskot; Hiiret; Sekalauma; Myyrät; Siat; Opossumit; Kanit; Pesukarhut; Rotat; Matelijat; Jyrsijät; Lammas; Haisunäädät; Käärmeet; Oravat; Kalkkunat; Kilpikonnat; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de animal: Castores; Pássaros; Javalis; Linces; Gatos; Gado; Camaleões; Galinhas; Chinchilas; Esquilos; Coiotes; Cervo; Cães; Patos; Furões; Raposas; Sapos; Geckos; Gansos; Gerbos; Cabras; Esquilo; Marmotas; Porquinhos da Índia; Hamsters; Ermitões; Lagartos; Ratos; Rebanho misto; Toupeiras; Porcos; Gambás; Coelhos; Guaxinins; Rato; Répteis; Roedores; Ovelha; Gambá; Cobras; Esquilos; Perus; Tartarugas; Outro
hu: Állat típusa: Hód; Madár; Vaddisznó; Amerikai hiúz; Macska; Szarvasmarha; Kaméleon; Csirke; Csincsilla; Amerikai mókus; Prérifarkas; Szarvas; Kutya; Kacsa; Görény; Róka; Béka; Gekkó; Liba; Futóegér; Kecske; Hörcsög; Mormota; Tengerimalac; Hörcsög; Remeterák; Gyík; Egér; Vegyes állomány; Vakond; Disznó; Oposszum; Nyúl; Mosómedve; Patkány; Hüllők; Rágcsálók; Juh; Bűzös borz; Kígyó; Mókus; Pulyka; Teknős; Egyéb
vi: Loại động vật: Hải ly; Chim; Lợn rừng; Linh miêu; Mèo; Gia súc; Tắc kè hoa; Gà; Sóc sin-sin; Sóc chuột; Chó sói; Nai; Chó; Vịt; Chồn sương; Cáo; Ếch; Tắc kè; Ngỗng; Chuột nhảy; Dê; Chuột nang; Chuột chũi; Chuột lang nhà; Chuột đuôi cụt; Cua ẩn sĩ; Thằn lằn; Chuột; Đàn động vật hỗn hợp; Chuột chù; Lợn; Thú có túi Possums; Thỏ; Gấu mèo; Loài chuột; Bò sát; Loài gặm nhấm; Cừu; Chồn hôi; Rắn; Sóc; Gà tây; Rùa; Khác
nl: Diertype: Bevers; Vogels; Zwijnen; Lynxen; Katten; Vee; Kameleons; Kippen; Chinchilla's; Aardeekhoorns; Coyotes; Herten; Honden; Eenden; Fretten; Vossen; Kikkers; Gekko's; Ganzen; Gerbils; Geiten; Grondeekhoorns; Bosmarmot; Cavia's; Hamsters; Heremietkreeften; Hagedissen; Muizen; Gemengde kudde; Mollen; Varkens; Opossums; Konijnen; Wasberen; Ratten; Reptielen; Knaagdieren; Schaap; Stinkdieren; Slangen; Eekhoorns; Kalkoenen; Schildpadden; Andere
el: Τύπος ζώου: Κάστορες; Πουλιά; Κάπροι; Λύγκες; Γάτες; Βοοειδή; Χαμαιλέοντες; Κοτόπουλα; Τσιντσιλά; Ευταμίες; Κογιότ; Ελάφια; Σκύλοι; Πάπιες; Κουνάβια; Αλεπούδες; Βάτραχοι; Γκέκο; Χήνες; Γερβίλοι; Κατσίκες; Γεώμυες; Μαρμότες; Ινδικά χοιρίδια; Χάμστερ; Καβούρια ερημίτες; Σαύρες; Ποντίκια; Μικτή αγέλη; Τυφλοπόντικες; Χοίροι; Μαρσιπόμυες; Κουνέλια; Ρακούν; Αρουραίοι; Ερπετά; Τρωκτικά; Πρόβατα; Μεφίτιδες; Φίδια; Σκίουροι; Γαλοπούλες; Χελώνες; Άλλο
it: Tipo di animale: Castori; Uccelli; Cinghiali; Bobcat; Gatti; Bestiame; Camaleonti; Polli; Cincillà; Scoiattoli; Coyote; Cervo; Cani; Anatre; Furetti; Volpi; Rane; Gechi; Oche; Gerbilli; Capre; Gopher; Marmotte; Porcellini d'India; Criceti; Paguri; Lucertole; Topi; Mandria mista; Talpe; Maiali; Opossum; Conigli; Procioni; Ratti; Rettili; Roditori; Pecora; Puzzole; Serpenti; Scoiattoli; Tacchini; Tartarughe; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta živali: Bobri; Ptice; Merjasci; Ameriški ris; Mačke; Živina; Kameleoni; Kokoši; Činčile; Veverički; Kojoti; Jelen; Psi; Race; Dihurji; Lisice; Žabe; Gekoni; Gosi; Skakač; Koze; Goferji; Gozdni svizci; Morski prašički; Hrčki; Raki puščavniki; Kuščarji; Miši; Mešana čreda; Krti; Prašiči; Oposumi; Zajci; Rakuni; Podgane; Plazilci; Glodalci; Ovce; Skunki; Kače; Veverice; Purani; Želve; Drugi
th: ประเภทสัตว์: บีเวอร์; นก; หมูป่า; บ็อบแคต; แมว; ปศุสัตว์; สัตว์จำพวกกิ้งก่า; ไก่; ชินชิลล่า; ชิปมังก์; หมาป่าโคโยตี้; กวาง; สุนัข; เป็ด; เฟอเรท; สุนัขจิ้งจอก; กบ; ตุ๊กแก; ห่าน; หนูเจอร์บิล; แพะ; โกเฟอร์; กราวด์ฮ็อก; หนูตะเภา; หนูแฮมสเตอร์; ปูเสฉวน; กิ้งก่า; หนู; ฝูงสัตว์หลายชนิด; ตุ่น; หมู; พอสซัม; กระต่าย; แรคคูน; หนู; สัตว์เลื้อยคลาน; สัตว์ฟันแทะ; แกะ; สกั๊งค์; งู; กระรอก; ไก่งวง; เต่า; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 動物類型: 河狸; 鳥類; 野豬; 小山貓; 貓; 牛; 變色龍; 雞; 龍貓; 花栗鼠; 郊狼; 鹿; 狗; 鴨子; 雪貂; 狐狸; 青蛙; 壁虎; 鵝; 沙鼠; 山羊; 囊鼠; 土撥鼠; 天竺鼠; 倉鼠; 寄居蟹; 蜥蜴; 老鼠; 牛群; 鼴鼠; 豬; 負鼠; 兔子; 浣熊; 大老鼠; 爬蟲類; 囓齒類動物; 羊; 臭鼬; 蛇; 松鼠; 火雞; 烏龜; 其他
cs: Typ zvířete: Bobři; Ptáci; Kanci; Rysi červení; Kočky; Dobytek; Chameleoni; Kuřata; Činčily; Čipmunkové; Kojoti; Jeleni; Psi; Kachny; Fretky; Lišky; Žáby; Gekoni; Husy; Pískomilové; Kozy; Pytlonoši; Svišti; Morčata; Křečci; Krabi poustevníci; Ještěrky; Myši; Více druhů dobytka; Krtci; Prasata; Vačice; Králíci; Mývalové; Krysy; Plazi; Hlodavci; Ovce; Skunkové; Hadi; Veverky; Krůty; Želvy; Jiné
de: Tierart: Biber; Vögel; Wildschweine; Rotluchse; Katzen; Vieh; Chamäleons; Hühner; Chinchillas; Streifenhörnchen; Kojoten; Rotwild; Hunde; Enten; Frettchen; Füchse; Frösche; Geckos; Gänse; Rennmäuse; Ziegen; Erdhörnchen; Murmeltiere; Meerschweinchen; Hamster; Einsiedlerkrebse; Eidechsen; Mäuse; Gemischte Herde; Maulwürfe; Schweine; Opossums; Kaninchen; Waschbären; Ratten; Reptilien; Nagetiere; Schaf; Stinktiere; Schlangen; Eichhörnchen; Truthähne; Schildkröten; Sonstiges
fr: Type d’animal: Castors; Oiseaux; Sangliers; Bobcats; Chats; Bétail; Caméléons; Poulets; Chinchillas; Tamias; Coyotes; Cerf; Chiens; Canards; Furets; Renards; Grenouilles; Geckos; Oies; Gerbilles; Chèvres; Gophers; Marmottes; Cochons d’Inde; Hamsters; Bernard l’Hermite; Lézards; Souris; Troupeau mixte; Taupes; Cochons; Opossums; Lapins; Ratons laveurs; Rats; Reptiles; Rongeurs; Mouton; Mouffettes; Serpents; Écureuils; Dindes; Tortues; Autre
en: Animal type: Beavers; Birds; Boars; Bobcats; Cats; Cattle; Chameleons; Chickens; Chinchillas; Chipmunks; Coyotes; Deer; Dogs; Ducks; Ferrets; Foxes; Frogs; Geckos; Geese; Gerbils; Goats; Gophers; Groundhogs; Guinea pigs; Hamsters; Hermit crabs; Lizards; Mice; Mixed herd; Moles; Pigs; Possums; Rabbits; Raccoons; Rats; Reptiles; Rodents; Sheep; Skunks; Snakes; Squirrels; Turkeys; Turtles; Other